Illinois, session 104th, SB2845.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Prompt Payment Act is amended by 5changing Sections 3-2, 3-6, and 7 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 540/3-2)7    Sec. 3-2. Beginning July 1, 1993, in any instance where a 8State official or agency is late in payment of a vendor's bill 9or invoice for goods or services furnished to the State, as 10defined in Section 1, properly approved in accordance with 11rules promulgated under Section 3-3, the State official or 12agency shall pay interest to the vendor in accordance with the 13following:14        (1) (Blank). Any bill, except a bill submitted under 15    Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code and except as 16    provided under paragraph (1.05) of this Section, approved 17    for payment under this Section must be paid or the payment 18    issued to the payee within 60 days of receipt of a proper 19    bill or invoice. If payment is not issued to the payee 20    within this 60-day period, an interest penalty of 1.0% of 21    any amount approved and unpaid shall be added for each 22    month or fraction thereof after the end of this 60-day 23    period, until final payment is made. Any bill, except a   SB2845- 2 -LRB104 17184 HLH 30603 b1    bill for pharmacy or nursing facility services or goods, 2    and except as provided under paragraph (1.05) of this 3    Section, submitted under Article V of the Illinois Public 4    Aid Code approved for payment under this Section must be 5    paid or the payment issued to the payee within 60 days 6    after receipt of a proper bill or invoice, and, if payment 7    is not issued to the payee within this 60-day period, an 8    interest penalty of 2.0% of any amount approved and unpaid 9    shall be added for each month or fraction thereof after 10    the end of this 60-day period, until final payment is 11    made. Any bill for pharmacy or nursing facility services 12    or goods submitted under Article V of the Illinois Public 13    Aid Code, except as provided under paragraph (1.05) of 14    this Section, and approved for payment under this Section 15    must be paid or the payment issued to the payee within 60 16    days of receipt of a proper bill or invoice. If payment is 17    not issued to the payee within this 60-day period, an 18    interest penalty of 1.0% of any amount approved and unpaid 19    shall be added for each month or fraction thereof after 20    the end of this 60-day period, until final payment is 21    made. 22        (1.05) For State fiscal year 2012 and future fiscal 23    years, any bill approved for payment under this Section 24    must be paid or the payment issued to the payee within 90 25    days of receipt of a proper bill or invoice. If payment is 26    not issued to the payee within this 90-day period, an   SB2845- 3 -LRB104 17184 HLH 30603 b1    interest penalty of 1.0% of any amount approved and unpaid 2    shall be added for each month, or 0.033% (one-thirtieth of 3    one percent) of any amount approved and unpaid for each 4    day, after the end of this 90-day period, until final 5    payment is made. 6        (1.1) A State agency shall review in a timely manner 7    each bill or invoice within 30 days after its receipt. If 8    the State agency determines that the bill or invoice 9    contains a defect making it unable to process the payment 10    request, the agency shall notify the vendor requesting 11    payment as soon as possible after discovering the defect 12    pursuant to rules promulgated under Section 3-3; provided, 13    however, that the notice for construction related bills or 14    invoices must be given not later than 30 days after the 15    bill or invoice was first submitted. The notice shall 16    identify the defect and any additional information 17    necessary to correct the defect. If one or more items on a 18    construction related bill or invoice are disapproved, but 19    not the entire bill or invoice, then the portion that is 20    not disapproved shall be paid in accordance with the 21    requirements of this Act. 22        (2) Where a State official or agency is late in 23    payment of a vendor's bill or invoice properly approved in 24    accordance with this Act, and different late payment terms 25    are not reduced to writing as a contractual agreement, the 26    State official or agency shall automatically pay interest   SB2845- 4 -LRB104 17184 HLH 30603 b1    penalties required by this Section amounting to $50 or 2    more to the appropriate vendor. Each agency shall be 3    responsible for determining whether an interest penalty is 4    owed and for paying the interest to the vendor. Except as 5    provided in paragraph (4), an individual interest payment 6    amounting to $5 or less shall not be paid by the State. 7    Interest due to a vendor that amounts to greater than $5 8    and less than $50 shall not be paid but shall be accrued 9    until all interest due the vendor for all similar warrants 10    exceeds $50, at which time the accrued interest shall be 11    payable and interest will begin accruing again, except 12    that interest accrued as of the end of the fiscal year that 13    does not exceed $50 shall be payable at that time. In the 14    event an individual has paid a vendor for services in 15    advance, the provisions of this Section shall apply until 16    payment is made to that individual.17        (3) The provisions of Public Act 96-1501 reducing the 18    interest rate on pharmacy claims under Article V of the 19    Illinois Public Aid Code to 1.0% per month shall apply to 20    any pharmacy bills for services and goods under Article V 21    of the Illinois Public Aid Code received on or after the 22    date 60 days before January 25, 2011 (the effective date 23    of Public Act 96-1501) except as provided under paragraph 24    (1.05) of this Section. 25        (4) Interest amounting to less than $5 shall not be 26    paid by the State, except for claims (i) to the Department   SB2845- 5 -LRB104 17184 HLH 30603 b1    of Healthcare and Family Services or the Department of 2    Human Services, (ii) pursuant to Article V of the Illinois 3    Public Aid Code, the Covering ALL KIDS Health Insurance 4    Act, or the Children's Health Insurance Program Act, and 5    (iii) made (A) by pharmacies for prescriptive services or 6    (B) by any federally qualified health center for 7    prescriptive services or any other services.8    Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, interest 9may not be paid under this Act when: (1) a Chief Procurement 10Officer has voided the underlying contract for goods or 11services under Article 50 of the Illinois Procurement Code; or 12(2) the Auditor General is conducting a performance or program 13audit and the Comptroller has held or is holding for review a 14related contract or vouchers for payment of goods or services 15in the exercise of duties under Section 9 of the State 16Comptroller Act. In such event, interest shall not accrue 17during the pendency of the Auditor General's review. 18(Source: P.A. 100-1064, eff. 8-24-18.) 19    (30 ILCS 540/3-6)20    Sec. 3-6. Federal funds; lack of authority. If an agency 21incurs an interest liability under this Act that cannot be 22charged to the same expenditure authority account to which the 23related goods or services were charged due to federal 24prohibitions, the agency is authorized to pay the interest 25from its available appropriations from the General Revenue   SB2845- 6 -LRB104 17184 HLH 30603 b1Fund or from any other moneys appropriated to the agency and 2not otherwise prohibited to be used for the purpose of paying 3interest, except that the Department of Transportation is 4authorized to pay the interest from its available 5appropriations from the Road Fund, as long as the original 6goods or services were for purposes consistent with Section 11 7of Article IX of the Illinois Constitution.8(Source: P.A. 103-588, eff. 6-5-24.) 9    (30 ILCS 540/7)  (from Ch. 127, par. 132.407)10    Sec. 7. Payments to subcontractors and material suppliers.11    (a) When a State official or agency responsible for 12administering a contract receives a bill or invoice from a 13contractor, that State official or agency shall confirm the 14date on which the bill or invoice was received within 15 15business days of receipt and shall transmit any approved 16amount to the Comptroller within 30 days of receipt.17    (a-1) When a State official or agency responsible for 18administering a contract submits a voucher to the Comptroller 19for payment to a contractor, that State official or agency 20shall promptly make available electronically the voucher 21number, the date of the voucher, and the amount of the voucher 22within 15 business days of submitting the voucher to the 23Comptroller. The State official or agency responsible for 24administering the contract shall provide subcontractors and 25material suppliers, known to the State official or agency,   SB2845- 7 -LRB104 17184 HLH 30603 b1with instructions on how to access the electronic information 2on the Comptroller's website.3    (a-5) When a contractor receives any payment, the 4contractor shall pay each subcontractor and material supplier 5electronically within 10 business days or 15 calendar days, 6whichever occurs earlier, or, if paid by a printed check, the 7printed check must be postmarked within 10 business days or 15 8calendar days, whichever occurs earlier, after receiving 9payment in proportion to the work completed by each 10subcontractor and material supplier its application or pay 11estimate, plus interest received under this Act. When a 12contractor receives any payment, the contractor shall pay each 13lower-tiered subcontractor and material supplier and each 14subcontractor and material supplier shall make payment to its 15own respective subcontractors and material suppliers. If the 16contractor receives less than the full payment due under the 17public construction contract, the contractor shall be 18obligated to disburse on a pro rata basis those funds 19received, plus interest received under this Act, with the 20contractor, subcontractors and material suppliers each 21receiving a prorated portion based on the amount of payment 22each has earned. When, however, the State official or agency 23does not release the full payment due under the contract 24because there are specific areas of work or materials the 25State agency or official has determined are not suitable for 26payment, then those specific subcontractors or material   SB2845- 8 -LRB104 17184 HLH 30603 b1suppliers involved shall not be paid for that portion of work 2rejected or deemed not suitable for payment and all other 3subcontractors and suppliers shall be paid based upon the 4amount of payment each has earned, plus interest received 5under this Act.6    (a-10) For construction contracts with the Department of 7Transportation, the contractor, subcontractor, or material 8supplier, regardless of tier, shall not offset, decrease, or 9diminish payment or payments that are due to its 10subcontractors or material suppliers without reasonable cause.11    A contractor, who refuses to make prompt payment within 10 12business days or 15 calendar days, whichever occurs earlier, 13after receiving payment, in whole or in part, shall provide to 14the subcontractor or material supplier and the public owner or 15its agent, a written notice of that refusal. The written 16notice shall be made by a contractor no later than 5 calendar 17days after payment is received by the contractor. The written 18notice shall identify the Department of Transportation's 19contract, any subcontract or material purchase agreement, a 20detailed reason for refusal, the value of the payment to be 21withheld, and the specific remedial actions required of the 22subcontractor or material supplier so that payment may be 23made. Written notice of refusal may be given in a form and 24method which is acceptable to the parties and public owner.25    (b) If the contractor, without reasonable cause, fails to 26make full payment of amounts due under subsection (a) to its   SB2845- 9 -LRB104 17184 HLH 30603 b1subcontractors and material suppliers within 10 business days 2or 15 calendar days, whichever occurs earlier, after receipt 3of payment from the State official or agency, the contractor 4shall pay to its subcontractors and material suppliers, in 5addition to the payment due them, interest in the amount of 2% 6per month, calculated from the expiration of the 710-business-day period or the 15-calendar-day period until 8fully paid. This subsection shall further apply to any 9payments made by subcontractors and material suppliers to 10their subcontractors and material suppliers and to all 11payments made to lower tier subcontractors and material 12suppliers throughout the contracting chain.13        (1) If a contractor, without reasonable cause, fails 14    to make payment in full as provided in subsection (a-5) 15    within 10 business days or 15 calendar days, whichever 16    occurs earlier, after receipt of payment under the public 17    construction contract, any subcontractor or material 18    supplier to whom payments are owed may file a written 19    notice and request for administrative hearing with the 20    State official or agency setting forth the amount owed by 21    the contractor and the contractor's failure to timely pay 22    the amount owed. The written notice and request for 23    administrative hearing shall identify the public 24    construction contract, the contractor, and the amount 25    owed, and shall contain a sworn statement or attestation 26    to verify the accuracy of the notice. The notice and   SB2845- 10 -LRB104 17184 HLH 30603 b1    request for administrative hearing shall be filed with the 2    State official for the public construction contract, with 3    a copy of the notice concurrently provided to the 4    contractor. Notice to the State official may be made by 5    certified or registered mail, messenger service, or 6    personal service, and must include proof of delivery to 7    the State official. 8        (2) The State official or agency, within 15 calendar 9    days after receipt of a subcontractor's or material 10    supplier's written notice and request for administrative 11    hearing, shall hold a hearing convened by an 12    administrative law judge to determine whether the 13    contractor withheld payment, without reasonable cause, 14    from the subcontractors or material suppliers and what 15    amount, if any, is due to the subcontractors or material 16    suppliers, and the reasonable cause or causes asserted by 17    the contractor. The State official or agency shall provide 18    appropriate notice to the parties of the date, time, and 19    location of the hearing. Each contractor, subcontractor, 20    or material supplier has the right to be represented by 21    counsel at a hearing and to cross-examine witnesses and 22    challenge documents. Upon the request of the subcontractor 23    or material supplier and a showing of good cause, 24    reasonable continuances may be granted by the 25    administrative law judge. 26        (3) Upon a finding by the administrative law judge   SB2845- 11 -LRB104 17184 HLH 30603 b1    that the contractor failed to make payment in full, 2    without reasonable cause, as provided in subsection 3    (a-10), then the administrative law judge shall, in 4    writing, order the contractor to pay the amount owed to 5    the subcontractors or material suppliers plus interest 6    within 15 calendar days after the order.7        (4) If a contractor fails to make full payment as 8    ordered under paragraph (3) of this subsection (b) within 9    15 days after the administrative law judge's order, then 10    the contractor shall be barred from entering into a State 11    public construction contract for a period of one year 12    beginning on the date of the administrative law judge's 13    order.14        (5) If, on 2 or more occasions within a 15    3-calendar-year period, there is a finding by an 16    administrative law judge that the contractor failed to 17    make payment in full, without reasonable cause, and a 18    written order was issued to a contractor under paragraph 19    (3) of this subsection (b), then the contractor shall be 20    barred from entering into a State public construction 21    contract for a period of 6 months beginning on the date of 22    the administrative law judge's second written order, even 23    if the payments required under the orders were made in 24    full.25        (6) If a contractor fails to make full payment as 26    ordered under paragraph (4) of this subsection (b), the   SB2845- 12 -LRB104 17184 HLH 30603 b1    subcontractor or material supplier may, within 30 days of 2    the date of that order, petition the State agency for an 3    order for reasonable attorney's fees and costs incurred in 4    the prosecution of the action under this subsection (b). 5    Upon that petition and taking of additional evidence, as 6    may be required, the administrative law judge may issue a 7    supplemental order directing the contractor to pay those 8    reasonable attorney's fees and costs.9        (7) The written order of the administrative law judge 10    shall be final and appealable under the Administrative 11    Review Law.12    (b-5) On or before July 2021, the Department of 13Transportation shall publish on its website a searchable 14database that allows for queries for each active construction 15contract by the name of a subcontractor or the pay item such 16that each pay item is associated with either the prime 17contractor or a subcontractor. 18    (c) This Section shall not be construed to in any manner 19diminish, negate, or interfere with the 20contractor-subcontractor or contractor-material supplier 21relationship or commercially useful function.22    (d) This Section shall not preclude, bar, or stay the 23rights, remedies, and defenses available to the parties by way 24of the operation of their contract, purchase agreement, the 25Mechanics Lien Act, or the Public Construction Bond Act.26    (e) State officials and agencies may adopt rules as may be   SB2845- 13 -LRB104 17184 HLH 30603 b1deemed necessary in order to establish the formal procedures 2required under this Section.3    (f) As used in this Section:4    "Payment" means the discharge of an obligation in money or 5other valuable consideration or thing delivered in full or 6partial satisfaction of an obligation to pay. "Payment" shall 7include interest paid pursuant to this Act.8    "Reasonable cause" may include, but is not limited to, 9unsatisfactory workmanship or materials; failure to provide 10documentation required by the contract, subcontract, or 11material purchase agreement; claims made against the 12Department of Transportation or the subcontractor pursuant to 13subsection (c) of Section 23 of the Mechanics Lien Act or the 14Public Construction Bond Act; judgments, levies, garnishments, 15or other court-ordered assessments or offsets in favor of the 16Department of Transportation or other State agency entered 17against a subcontractor or material supplier. "Reasonable 18cause" does not include payments issued to the contractor that 19create a negative or reduced valuation pay application or pay 20estimate due to a reduction of contract quantities or work not 21performed or provided by the subcontractor or material 22supplier; the interception or withholding of funds for reasons 23not related to the subcontractor's or material supplier's work 24on the contract; anticipated claims or assessments of third 25parties not a party related to the contract or subcontract; 26asserted claims or assessments of third parties that are not   SB2845- 14 -LRB104 17184 HLH 30603 b1authorized by court order, administrative tribunal, or 2statute. "Reasonable cause" further does not include the 3withholding, offset, or reduction of payment, in whole or in 4part, due to the assessment of liquidated damages or penalties 5assessed by the Department of Transportation against the 6contractor, unless the subcontractor's performance or supplied 7materials were the sole and proximate cause of the liquidated 8damage or penalty. 9(Source: P.A. 100-43, eff. 8-9-17; 100-376, eff. 1-1-18; 10100-863, eff. 8-14-18; 101-524, eff. 1-1-20.)